src/scripts/Slovak/unicodechars.foma
#Do not edit, file automatically generated.
#
#For g2p:
define UnicodeToNativeTranslit 
[%à] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%â] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ầ|%Ầ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ấ|%Ấ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ẫ|%Ẫ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ẩ|%Ẩ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ã] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ā|%Ā] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ă|%Ă] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ằ|%Ằ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ắ|%Ắ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ẵ|%Ẵ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ẳ|%Ẳ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ȧ|%Ȧ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ǡ|%Ǡ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ả|%Ả] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%å] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ǻ|%Ǻ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ǎ|%Ǎ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ȁ|%Ȁ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ȃ|%Ȃ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ą|%Ą] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ḃ|%Ḃ] -> {b} || _ ,,
[%ć|%Ć] -> {c} || _ ,,
[%ḉ|%Ḉ] -> {c} || _ ,,
[%ĉ|%Ĉ] -> {c} || _ ,,
[%ċ|%Ċ] -> {c} || _ ,,
[%ç] -> {c} || _ ,,
[%ḉ|%Ḉ] -> {c} || _ ,,
[%ḋ|%Ḋ] -> {d} || _ ,,
[%ḑ|%Ḑ] -> {d} || _ ,,
[%è] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ê] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ề|%Ề] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ế|%Ế] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ễ|%Ễ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ể|%Ể] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ẽ|%Ẽ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ē|%Ē] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ḕ|%Ḕ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ḗ|%Ḗ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ĕ|%Ĕ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ḝ|%Ḝ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ė|%Ė] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ë] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ẻ|%Ẻ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ȅ|%Ȅ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ȇ|%Ȇ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ȩ|%Ȩ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ḝ|%Ḝ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ę|%Ę] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ḟ|%Ḟ] -> {f} || _ ,,
[%ǵ|%Ǵ] -> {g} || _ ,,
[%ĝ|%Ĝ] -> {g} || _ ,,
[%ḡ|%Ḡ] -> {g} || _ ,,
[%ğ|%Ğ] -> {g} || _ ,,
[%ġ|%Ġ] -> {g} || _ ,,
[%ǧ|%Ǧ] -> {g} || _ ,,
[%ģ|%Ģ] -> {g} || _ ,,
[%ĥ|%Ĥ] -> {h} || _ ,,
[%ḣ|%Ḣ] -> {h} || _ ,,
[%ḧ|%Ḧ] -> {h} || _ ,,
[%ȟ|%Ȟ] -> {h} || _ ,,
[%ḩ|%Ḩ] -> {h} || _ ,,
[%ì] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%î] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ĩ|%Ĩ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ī|%Ī] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ĭ|%Ĭ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ï] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ḯ|%Ḯ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ỉ|%Ỉ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ǐ|%Ǐ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ȉ|%Ȉ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ȋ|%Ȋ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%į|%Į] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ĵ|%Ĵ] -> {j} || _ ,,
[%ǰ] -> {j} || _ ,,
[%ḱ|%Ḱ] -> {k} || _ ,,
[%ǩ|%Ǩ] -> {k} || _ ,,
[%ķ|%Ķ] -> {k} || _ ,,
[%ļ|%Ļ] -> {l} || _ ,,
[%ḿ|%Ḿ] -> {m} || _ ,,
[%ṁ|%Ṁ] -> {m} || _ ,,
[%ǹ|%Ǹ] -> {n} || _ ,,
[%ń|%Ń] -> {n} || _ ,,
[%ñ] -> {n} || _ ,,
[%ṅ|%Ṅ] -> {n} || _ ,,
[%ņ|%Ņ] -> {n} || _ ,,
[%ò] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%õ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ṍ|%Ṍ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ȭ|%Ȭ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ṏ|%Ṏ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ō|%Ō] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ṑ|%Ṑ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ṓ|%Ṓ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ǭ|%Ǭ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ŏ|%Ŏ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ȯ|%Ȯ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ȱ|%Ȱ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ỏ|%Ỏ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ő|%Ő] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ǒ|%Ǒ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ȍ|%Ȍ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ȏ|%Ȏ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ǫ|%Ǫ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ǭ|%Ǭ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ṕ|%Ṕ] -> {p} || _ ,,
[%ṗ|%Ṗ] -> {p} || _ ,,
[%ṙ|%Ṙ] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%ȑ|%Ȑ] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%ȓ|%Ȓ] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%ŗ|%Ŗ] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%ś|%Ś] -> {s} || _ ,,
[%ṥ|%Ṥ] -> {s} || _ ,,
[%ŝ|%Ŝ] -> {s} || _ ,,
[%ṡ|%Ṡ] -> {s} || _ ,,
[%ș|%Ș] -> {s} || _ ,,
[%ş|%Ş] -> {s} || _ ,,
[%ṫ|%Ṫ] -> {t} || _ ,,
[%ẗ] -> {t} || _ ,,
[%ț|%Ț] -> {t} || _ ,,
[%ţ|%Ţ] -> {t} || _ ,,
[%ù] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%û] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%ũ|%Ũ] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%ṹ|%Ṹ] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%ū|%Ū] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%ṻ|%Ṻ] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%ŭ|%Ŭ] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%ủ|%Ủ] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%ű|%Ű] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%ǔ|%Ǔ] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%ȕ|%Ȕ] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%ȗ|%Ȗ] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%ų|%Ų] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%ṽ|%Ṽ] -> {v} || _ ,,
[%ẁ|%Ẁ] -> {w} || _ ,,
[%ẃ|%Ẃ] -> {w} || _ ,,
[%ŵ|%Ŵ] -> {w} || _ ,,
[%ẇ|%Ẇ] -> {w} || _ ,,
[%ẅ|%Ẅ] -> {w} || _ ,,
[%ẘ] -> {w} || _ ,,
[%ẋ|%Ẋ] -> {x} || _ ,,
[%ẍ|%Ẍ] -> {x} || _ ,,
[%ỳ|%Ỳ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ŷ|%Ŷ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ỹ|%Ỹ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ȳ|%Ȳ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ẏ|%Ẏ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ÿ|%Ÿ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ỷ|%Ỷ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ẙ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ź|%Ź] -> {z} || _ ,,
[%ẑ|%Ẑ] -> {z} || _ ,,
[%ż|%Ż] -> {z} || _ ,,
[%đ|%Đ] -> {d} || _ ,,
[%ħ|%Ħ] -> {h} || _ ,,
[%ı] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ł|%Ł] -> {l} || _ ,,
[%ŧ|%Ŧ] -> {t} || _ ,,
[%ƀ|%Ƀ] -> {b} || _ ,,
[%ɓ|%Ɓ] -> {b} || _ ,,
[%ƃ|%Ƃ] -> {b} || _ ,,
[%ɔ|%Ɔ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ƈ|%Ƈ] -> {c} || _ ,,
[%ɖ|%Ɖ] -> {d} || _ ,,
[%ɗ|%Ɗ] -> {d} || _ ,,
[%ƌ|%Ƌ] -> {d} || _ ,,
[%ǝ|%Ǝ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ɛ|%Ɛ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ɠ|%Ɠ] -> {g} || _ ,,
[%ɩ|%Ɩ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ɨ|%Ɨ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ƙ|%Ƙ] -> {k} || _ ,,
[%ƚ|%Ƚ] -> {l} || _ ,,
[%ɯ|%Ɯ] -> {m} || _ ,,
[%ɲ|%Ɲ] -> {n} || _ ,,
[%ƞ|%Ƞ] -> {n} || _ ,,
[%ɵ|%Ɵ] -> {o} || _ ,,
[%ƥ|%Ƥ] -> {p} || _ ,,
[%ƫ|%ƫ] -> {t} || _ ,,
[%ƭ|%Ƭ] -> {t} || _ ,,
[%ʈ|%Ʈ] -> {t} || _ ,,
[%ʋ|%Ʋ] -> {v} || _ ,,
[%ƴ|%Ƴ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ƶ|%Ƶ] -> {z} || _ ,,
[%ƻ|%ƻ] -> {2} || _ ,,
[%ǥ|%Ǥ] -> {g} || _ ,,
[%ȡ|%ȡ] -> {d} || _ ,,
[%ȥ|%Ȥ] -> {z} || _ ,,
[%ȴ|%ȴ] -> {l} || _ ,,
[%ȵ|%ȵ] -> {n} || _ ,,
[%ȶ|%ȶ] -> {t} || _ ,,
[%ȷ|%ȷ] -> {j} || _ ,,
[%ȸ|%ȸ] -> {d} || _ ,,
[%ⱥ|%Ⱥ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ȼ|%Ȼ] -> {c} || _ ,,
[%ⱦ|%Ⱦ] -> {t} || _ ,,
[%ȿ|%Ȿ] -> {s} || _ ,,
[%ɀ|%Ɀ] -> {z} || _ ,,
[%ʉ|%Ʉ] -> {u} || _ ,,
[%ʌ|%Ʌ] -> {v} || _ ,,
[%ɇ|%Ɇ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ɉ|%Ɉ] -> {j} || _ ,,
[%ɋ|%Ɋ] -> {q} || _ ,,
[%ɍ|%Ɍ] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%ɏ|%Ɏ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ɐ|%Ɐ] -> {a} || _ ,,
[%ɕ|%ɕ] -> {c} || _ ,,
[%ɘ|%ɘ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ɜ|%Ɜ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ɝ|%ɝ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ɞ|%ɞ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ɟ|%ɟ] -> {j} || _ ,,
[%ɡ|%Ɡ] -> {g} || _ ,,
[%ɢ|%ɢ] -> {g} || _ ,,
[%ɥ|%Ɥ] -> {h} || _ ,,
[%ɦ|%Ɦ] -> {h} || _ ,,
[%ɪ|%Ɪ] -> {i} || _ ,,
[%ɫ|%Ɫ] -> {l} || _ ,,
[%ɬ|%Ɬ] -> {l} || _ ,,
[%ɭ|%ɭ] -> {l} || _ ,,
[%ɰ|%ɰ] -> {m} || _ ,,
[%ɱ|%Ɱ] -> {m} || _ ,,
[%ɳ|%ɳ] -> {n} || _ ,,
[%ɴ|%ɴ] -> {n} || _ ,,
[%ɶ|%ɶ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ɹ|%ɹ] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%ɺ|%ɺ] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%ɻ|%ɻ] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%ɼ|%ɼ] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%ɽ|%Ɽ] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%ɾ|%ɾ] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%ɿ|%ɿ] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%ʁ|%ʁ] -> {r} || _ ,,
[%ʂ|%Ʂ] -> {s} || _ ,,
[%ʄ|%ʄ] -> {j} || _ ,,
[%ʇ|%Ʇ] -> {t} || _ ,,
[%ʍ|%ʍ] -> {w} || _ ,,
[%ʎ|%ʎ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ʏ|%ʏ] -> {y} || _ ,,
[%ʐ|%ʐ] -> {z} || _ ,,
[%ʑ|%ʑ] -> {z} || _ ,,
[%ʗ|%ʗ] -> {c} || _ ,,
[%ʙ|%ʙ] -> {b} || _ ,,
[%ʚ|%ʚ] -> {e} || _ ,,
[%ʛ|%ʛ] -> {g} || _ ,,
[%ʜ|%ʜ] -> {h} || _ ,,
[%ʝ|%Ʝ] -> {j} || _ ,,
[%ʞ|%Ʞ] -> {k} || _ ,,
[%ʟ|%ʟ] -> {l} || _ ,,
[%ʠ|%ʠ] -> {q} || _ ,,
[%ʮ|%ʮ] -> {h} || _ ,,
[%ʯ|%ʯ] -> {h} || _ ;


#For tok (single char to single letter):
define UnicodeToNativeTranslitTok 
[%à] -> a || _ ,,
[%â] -> a || _ ,,
[%ầ|%Ầ] -> a || _ ,,
[%ấ|%Ấ] -> a || _ ,,
[%ẫ|%Ẫ] -> a || _ ,,
[%ẩ|%Ẩ] -> a || _ ,,
[%ã] -> a || _ ,,
[%ā|%Ā] -> a || _ ,,
[%ă|%Ă] -> a || _ ,,
[%ằ|%Ằ] -> a || _ ,,
[%ắ|%Ắ] -> a || _ ,,
[%ẵ|%Ẵ] -> a || _ ,,
[%ẳ|%Ẳ] -> a || _ ,,
[%ȧ|%Ȧ] -> a || _ ,,
[%ǡ|%Ǡ] -> a || _ ,,
[%ả|%Ả] -> a || _ ,,
[%å] -> a || _ ,,
[%ǻ|%Ǻ] -> a || _ ,,
[%ǎ|%Ǎ] -> a || _ ,,
[%ȁ|%Ȁ] -> a || _ ,,
[%ȃ|%Ȃ] -> a || _ ,,
[%ą|%Ą] -> a || _ ,,
[%ḃ|%Ḃ] -> b || _ ,,
[%ć|%Ć] -> c || _ ,,
[%ḉ|%Ḉ] -> c || _ ,,
[%ĉ|%Ĉ] -> c || _ ,,
[%ċ|%Ċ] -> c || _ ,,
[%ç] -> c || _ ,,
[%ḉ|%Ḉ] -> c || _ ,,
[%ḋ|%Ḋ] -> d || _ ,,
[%ḑ|%Ḑ] -> d || _ ,,
[%è] -> e || _ ,,
[%ê] -> e || _ ,,
[%ề|%Ề] -> e || _ ,,
[%ế|%Ế] -> e || _ ,,
[%ễ|%Ễ] -> e || _ ,,
[%ể|%Ể] -> e || _ ,,
[%ẽ|%Ẽ] -> e || _ ,,
[%ē|%Ē] -> e || _ ,,
[%ḕ|%Ḕ] -> e || _ ,,
[%ḗ|%Ḗ] -> e || _ ,,
[%ĕ|%Ĕ] -> e || _ ,,
[%ḝ|%Ḝ] -> e || _ ,,
[%ė|%Ė] -> e || _ ,,
[%ë] -> e || _ ,,
[%ẻ|%Ẻ] -> e || _ ,,
[%ȅ|%Ȅ] -> e || _ ,,
[%ȇ|%Ȇ] -> e || _ ,,
[%ȩ|%Ȩ] -> e || _ ,,
[%ḝ|%Ḝ] -> e || _ ,,
[%ę|%Ę] -> e || _ ,,
[%ḟ|%Ḟ] -> f || _ ,,
[%ǵ|%Ǵ] -> g || _ ,,
[%ĝ|%Ĝ] -> g || _ ,,
[%ḡ|%Ḡ] -> g || _ ,,
[%ğ|%Ğ] -> g || _ ,,
[%ġ|%Ġ] -> g || _ ,,
[%ǧ|%Ǧ] -> g || _ ,,
[%ģ|%Ģ] -> g || _ ,,
[%ĥ|%Ĥ] -> h || _ ,,
[%ḣ|%Ḣ] -> h || _ ,,
[%ḧ|%Ḧ] -> h || _ ,,
[%ȟ|%Ȟ] -> h || _ ,,
[%ḩ|%Ḩ] -> h || _ ,,
[%ì] -> i || _ ,,
[%î] -> i || _ ,,
[%ĩ|%Ĩ] -> i || _ ,,
[%ī|%Ī] -> i || _ ,,
[%ĭ|%Ĭ] -> i || _ ,,
[%ï] -> i || _ ,,
[%ḯ|%Ḯ] -> i || _ ,,
[%ỉ|%Ỉ] -> i || _ ,,
[%ǐ|%Ǐ] -> i || _ ,,
[%ȉ|%Ȉ] -> i || _ ,,
[%ȋ|%Ȋ] -> i || _ ,,
[%į|%Į] -> i || _ ,,
[%ĵ|%Ĵ] -> j || _ ,,
[%ǰ] -> j || _ ,,
[%ḱ|%Ḱ] -> k || _ ,,
[%ǩ|%Ǩ] -> k || _ ,,
[%ķ|%Ķ] -> k || _ ,,
[%ļ|%Ļ] -> l || _ ,,
[%ḿ|%Ḿ] -> m || _ ,,
[%ṁ|%Ṁ] -> m || _ ,,
[%ǹ|%Ǹ] -> n || _ ,,
[%ń|%Ń] -> n || _ ,,
[%ñ] -> n || _ ,,
[%ṅ|%Ṅ] -> n || _ ,,
[%ņ|%Ņ] -> n || _ ,,
[%ò] -> o || _ ,,
[%õ] -> o || _ ,,
[%ṍ|%Ṍ] -> o || _ ,,
[%ȭ|%Ȭ] -> o || _ ,,
[%ṏ|%Ṏ] -> o || _ ,,
[%ō|%Ō] -> o || _ ,,
[%ṑ|%Ṑ] -> o || _ ,,
[%ṓ|%Ṓ] -> o || _ ,,
[%ǭ|%Ǭ] -> o || _ ,,
[%ŏ|%Ŏ] -> o || _ ,,
[%ȯ|%Ȯ] -> o || _ ,,
[%ȱ|%Ȱ] -> o || _ ,,
[%ỏ|%Ỏ] -> o || _ ,,
[%ő|%Ő] -> o || _ ,,
[%ǒ|%Ǒ] -> o || _ ,,
[%ȍ|%Ȍ] -> o || _ ,,
[%ȏ|%Ȏ] -> o || _ ,,
[%ǫ|%Ǫ] -> o || _ ,,
[%ǭ|%Ǭ] -> o || _ ,,
[%ṕ|%Ṕ] -> p || _ ,,
[%ṗ|%Ṗ] -> p || _ ,,
[%ṙ|%Ṙ] -> r || _ ,,
[%ȑ|%Ȑ] -> r || _ ,,
[%ȓ|%Ȓ] -> r || _ ,,
[%ŗ|%Ŗ] -> r || _ ,,
[%ś|%Ś] -> s || _ ,,
[%ṥ|%Ṥ] -> s || _ ,,
[%ŝ|%Ŝ] -> s || _ ,,
[%ṡ|%Ṡ] -> s || _ ,,
[%ș|%Ș] -> s || _ ,,
[%ş|%Ş] -> s || _ ,,
[%ṫ|%Ṫ] -> t || _ ,,
[%ẗ] -> t || _ ,,
[%ț|%Ț] -> t || _ ,,
[%ţ|%Ţ] -> t || _ ,,
[%ù] -> u || _ ,,
[%û] -> u || _ ,,
[%ũ|%Ũ] -> u || _ ,,
[%ṹ|%Ṹ] -> u || _ ,,
[%ū|%Ū] -> u || _ ,,
[%ṻ|%Ṻ] -> u || _ ,,
[%ŭ|%Ŭ] -> u || _ ,,
[%ủ|%Ủ] -> u || _ ,,
[%ű|%Ű] -> u || _ ,,
[%ǔ|%Ǔ] -> u || _ ,,
[%ȕ|%Ȕ] -> u || _ ,,
[%ȗ|%Ȗ] -> u || _ ,,
[%ų|%Ų] -> u || _ ,,
[%ṽ|%Ṽ] -> v || _ ,,
[%ẁ|%Ẁ] -> w || _ ,,
[%ẃ|%Ẃ] -> w || _ ,,
[%ŵ|%Ŵ] -> w || _ ,,
[%ẇ|%Ẇ] -> w || _ ,,
[%ẅ|%Ẅ] -> w || _ ,,
[%ẘ] -> w || _ ,,
[%ẋ|%Ẋ] -> x || _ ,,
[%ẍ|%Ẍ] -> x || _ ,,
[%ỳ|%Ỳ] -> y || _ ,,
[%ŷ|%Ŷ] -> y || _ ,,
[%ỹ|%Ỹ] -> y || _ ,,
[%ȳ|%Ȳ] -> y || _ ,,
[%ẏ|%Ẏ] -> y || _ ,,
[%ÿ|%Ÿ] -> y || _ ,,
[%ỷ|%Ỷ] -> y || _ ,,
[%ẙ] -> y || _ ,,
[%ź|%Ź] -> z || _ ,,
[%ẑ|%Ẑ] -> z || _ ,,
[%ż|%Ż] -> z || _ ,,
[%đ|%Đ] -> d || _ ,,
[%ħ|%Ħ] -> h || _ ,,
[%ı] -> i || _ ,,
[%ł|%Ł] -> l || _ ,,
[%ŧ|%Ŧ] -> t || _ ,,
[%ƀ|%Ƀ] -> b || _ ,,
[%ɓ|%Ɓ] -> b || _ ,,
[%ƃ|%Ƃ] -> b || _ ,,
[%ɔ|%Ɔ] -> o || _ ,,
[%ƈ|%Ƈ] -> c || _ ,,
[%ɖ|%Ɖ] -> d || _ ,,
[%ɗ|%Ɗ] -> d || _ ,,
[%ƌ|%Ƌ] -> d || _ ,,
[%ǝ|%Ǝ] -> e || _ ,,
[%ɛ|%Ɛ] -> e || _ ,,
[%ɠ|%Ɠ] -> g || _ ,,
[%ɩ|%Ɩ] -> i || _ ,,
[%ɨ|%Ɨ] -> i || _ ,,
[%ƙ|%Ƙ] -> k || _ ,,
[%ƚ|%Ƚ] -> l || _ ,,
[%ɯ|%Ɯ] -> m || _ ,,
[%ɲ|%Ɲ] -> n || _ ,,
[%ƞ|%Ƞ] -> n || _ ,,
[%ɵ|%Ɵ] -> o || _ ,,
[%ƥ|%Ƥ] -> p || _ ,,
[%ƫ|%ƫ] -> t || _ ,,
[%ƭ|%Ƭ] -> t || _ ,,
[%ʈ|%Ʈ] -> t || _ ,,
[%ʋ|%Ʋ] -> v || _ ,,
[%ƴ|%Ƴ] -> y || _ ,,
[%ƶ|%Ƶ] -> z || _ ,,
[%ƻ|%ƻ] -> 2 || _ ,,
[%ǥ|%Ǥ] -> g || _ ,,
[%ȡ|%ȡ] -> d || _ ,,
[%ȥ|%Ȥ] -> z || _ ,,
[%ȴ|%ȴ] -> l || _ ,,
[%ȵ|%ȵ] -> n || _ ,,
[%ȶ|%ȶ] -> t || _ ,,
[%ȷ|%ȷ] -> j || _ ,,
[%ȸ|%ȸ] -> d || _ ,,
[%ⱥ|%Ⱥ] -> a || _ ,,
[%ȼ|%Ȼ] -> c || _ ,,
[%ⱦ|%Ⱦ] -> t || _ ,,
[%ȿ|%Ȿ] -> s || _ ,,
[%ɀ|%Ɀ] -> z || _ ,,
[%ʉ|%Ʉ] -> u || _ ,,
[%ʌ|%Ʌ] -> v || _ ,,
[%ɇ|%Ɇ] -> e || _ ,,
[%ɉ|%Ɉ] -> j || _ ,,
[%ɋ|%Ɋ] -> q || _ ,,
[%ɍ|%Ɍ] -> r || _ ,,
[%ɏ|%Ɏ] -> y || _ ,,
[%ɐ|%Ɐ] -> a || _ ,,
[%ɕ|%ɕ] -> c || _ ,,
[%ɘ|%ɘ] -> e || _ ,,
[%ɜ|%Ɜ] -> e || _ ,,
[%ɝ|%ɝ] -> e || _ ,,
[%ɞ|%ɞ] -> e || _ ,,
[%ɟ|%ɟ] -> j || _ ,,
[%ɡ|%Ɡ] -> g || _ ,,
[%ɢ|%ɢ] -> g || _ ,,
[%ɥ|%Ɥ] -> h || _ ,,
[%ɦ|%Ɦ] -> h || _ ,,
[%ɪ|%Ɪ] -> i || _ ,,
[%ɫ|%Ɫ] -> l || _ ,,
[%ɬ|%Ɬ] -> l || _ ,,
[%ɭ|%ɭ] -> l || _ ,,
[%ɰ|%ɰ] -> m || _ ,,
[%ɱ|%Ɱ] -> m || _ ,,
[%ɳ|%ɳ] -> n || _ ,,
[%ɴ|%ɴ] -> n || _ ,,
[%ɶ|%ɶ] -> e || _ ,,
[%ɹ|%ɹ] -> r || _ ,,
[%ɺ|%ɺ] -> r || _ ,,
[%ɻ|%ɻ] -> r || _ ,,
[%ɼ|%ɼ] -> r || _ ,,
[%ɽ|%Ɽ] -> r || _ ,,
[%ɾ|%ɾ] -> r || _ ,,
[%ɿ|%ɿ] -> r || _ ,,
[%ʁ|%ʁ] -> r || _ ,,
[%ʂ|%Ʂ] -> s || _ ,,
[%ʄ|%ʄ] -> j || _ ,,
[%ʇ|%Ʇ] -> t || _ ,,
[%ʍ|%ʍ] -> w || _ ,,
[%ʎ|%ʎ] -> y || _ ,,
[%ʏ|%ʏ] -> y || _ ,,
[%ʐ|%ʐ] -> z || _ ,,
[%ʑ|%ʑ] -> z || _ ,,
[%ʗ|%ʗ] -> c || _ ,,
[%ʙ|%ʙ] -> b || _ ,,
[%ʚ|%ʚ] -> e || _ ,,
[%ʛ|%ʛ] -> g || _ ,,
[%ʜ|%ʜ] -> h || _ ,,
[%ʝ|%Ʝ] -> j || _ ,,
[%ʞ|%Ʞ] -> k || _ ,,
[%ʟ|%ʟ] -> l || _ ,,
[%ʠ|%ʠ] -> q || _ ,,
[%ʮ|%ʮ] -> h || _ ,,
[%ʯ|%ʯ] -> h || _ ;
